nl: Stijl sneaker: Atletisch; Mode; Hoge top; Lage top; Opschuifsluiting; Andere
pt-BR: Estilo tênis: Esportivo; Moda; Cano alto; Cano baixo; Slip-on; Outro
pt-PT: Estilo para sapatilhas: Atlético; Moda; Topo alto; Topo baixo; Slip-on; Outro
el: Στυλ sneaker: Αθλητικό; Μοδάτη; Ψηλό πάνω; Χαμηλό πάνω; Ολίσθησης; Άλλο
sk-SK: Štýl tenisiek: Atletický; Móda; Vysoký; Nízky; Nazúvací; Iné
en: Sneaker style: Athletic; Fashion; High-top; Low-top; Slip-on; Other
nb: Sneakerstil: Atletisk; Mote; Høytopp; Lavtopp; Slip-on; Annet
th: สไตล์รองเท้าผ้าใบ: สำหรับนักกีฬา; แฟชั่น; ข้อสูง; ข้อต่ำ; สลิปออน; อื่นๆ
ko: 스니커즈 스타일: Athletic; 패션; 하이톱; 로우톱; 슬립온; 기타
tr: Spor Ayakkabı stili: Atletik; Moda; Yüksek; Düşük; Kaydırmalı; Diğer
cs: Styl tenisek: Atletické; Móda; Vysoký kotník; Nízký kotník; Nazouvací; Jiné
sv: Stil på sneakers: Atletisk; Mode; Hög topp; Låg topp; Slip-on; Övrigt
it: Stile scarpa da ginnastica: Atletico; Moda; In cima; In basso; Slip on; Altro
sl-SI: Stil superg: Atletski; Modni; Visoki; Nizki; Natikanje; Drugo
ja: スニーカースタイル: アスレチック; ファッション; ハイトップ; ロートップ; スリップオン; その他
da: Sneakerstil: Atletisk; Mode; High-top; Low-top; Slip-on; Andet
fi: Lenkkarityyli: Urheilullinen; Muoti; Korkea varsi; Matala varsi; Slip-on; Muu
ro-RO: Tipul de adidași: Sport; Modă; Înalți; Joși; Slip-on; Altele
lt-LT: Sportinių batelių stilius: Sportiniai; Madingi; Su auliuku; Be auliuko; Užmaunami; Kita
fr: Style de baskets: Athlétique; Mode; Montant; Bas; À enfiler; Autre
de: Sneaker-Stil: Sportlich; Mode; High-top; Low-top; Slipper; Sonstiges
pl: Styl butów sportowych: Sportowe; Moda; O wysokiej konstrukcji; O niskiej konstrukcji; Wsuwane; Inne
hr-HR: Model tenisica: Atletske; Modne; Visoke; Niske; Bez vezivanja; Ostalo
zh-TW: 運動鞋款式: 運動; 時尚; 高幫; 低幫; 夾式; 其他
vi: Phong cách giày thể thao: Đồng hồ thể thao; Thời trang; Cổ cao; Cổ thấp; Giáy slip-on; Khác
hu: Edzőcipő stílusa: Atlétikai; Divat; Magas tetejű; Alacsony tetejű; Bebújós; Egyéb
zh-CN: 运动鞋款式: 运动; 时尚; 高帮; 低帮; 不系带; 其他
bg-BG: Стил маратонки: Спортна; Мода; Висок връх; Нисък връх; Slip-on; Други
ru: Фасон кроссовок: Спортивные; Модные; Высокий верх; Низкий верх; Слипоны; Другие
es: Estilo de zapatillas: Atletismo; Moda; Caña alta; Caña baja; Sin cordones; Otros